Utah statutes.
78A-11-113.   Subpoena power of the commission -- Testimony -- Contempt.

(1)  The commission may issue subpoenas in aid of an investigation of a complaint filed with the commission.  The subpoena shall have the same authority as an order of the district court.  Commission subpoenas shall be issued in the manner and form prescribed for subpoenas by the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.  Commission subpoenas shall be served in the manner prescribed for subpoenas by the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.

(2)  The commission may administer oaths and compel testimony under oath in aid of an investigation of a complaint filed with the commission and at hearings before the commission.

(3)  If a person fails to comply with a subpoena, or if a person appears before the commission and refuses to testify to a matter upon which the person may be lawfully questioned, the person is in contempt of the commission, and the commission may file in the district court a motion for an order to show cause why the penalties established in Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 3, Contempt, should not be imposed.

